src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
@P.Paradigm.VAI@ VAI_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.VAIO@ VAIO_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.VAIPL@ VAIPL_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.VII@ VII_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.VIIPL@ VIIPL_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.VTA@ VTA_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.VTI@ VTI_Prefix ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAIO                                                       !
!         Prefixes                                                             !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAIO_Prefix
@P.Prefix.%<CHCNJ%>@:@P.Prefix.%<CHCNJ%>@%<ChCnj%> VAIO_PrefixBoundary ;
@P.Prefix.GAA-@:@P.Prefix.GAA-@gaa- VAIO_PrefixBoundary ;
@P.Prefix.GI@:@P.Prefix.GI@gi VAIO_PrefixBoundary ;
@P.Prefix.GIDW@:@P.Prefix.GIDW@gidw VAIO_PrefixBoundary ;
@P.Prefix.NI@:@P.Prefix.NI@ni VAIO_PrefixBoundary ;
@P.Prefix.NONE@ VAIO_PrefixBoundary ;
@P.Prefix.O@:@P.Prefix.O@o VAIO_PrefixBoundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAIO                                                       !
!         Morpheme boundary between prefix and stem                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAIO_PrefixBoundary
0:%<%< PreverbRoot ;

LEXICON VerbStems
@R.Paradigm.VAI@ VAI_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.VAIO@ VAIO_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.VAIPL@ VAIPL_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.VII@ VII_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.VIIPL@ VIIPL_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.VTA@ VTA_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.VTI@ VTI_Stems ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAIO                                                       !
!         Stems                                                                !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary
0:%>%> VAIO_Class=VAIO_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAIO, Class: VAIO                                          !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAIO_Class=VAIO_Flags
@R.Prefix.%<CHCNJ%>@ VAIO_Class=VAIO_Flags_Prefix=%<CHCNJ%> ;
@R.Prefix.GAA-@ VAIO_Class=VAIO_Flags_Prefix=GAA- ;
@R.Prefix.GI@ VAIO_Class=VAIO_Flags_Prefix=GI ;
@R.Prefix.GIDW@ VAIO_Class=VAIO_Flags_Prefix=GIDW ;
@R.Prefix.NI@ VAIO_Class=VAIO_Flags_Prefix=NI ;
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VAIO_Class=VAIO_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;
@R.Prefix.O@ VAIO_Class=VAIO_Flags_Prefix=O ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAIO, Class: VAIO                                          !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAIO_Class=VAIO_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Cnj@ VAIO_Class=VAIO_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings ;
@U.Order.Ind@ VAIO_Class=VAIO_Prefix=NONE_Order=Ind_Endings ;
@U.Order.Other@ VAIO_Class=VAIO_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAIO, Class: VAIO, Prefix: NONE, Order: Cnj                !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAIO_Stems
aakozin:aakozi VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
aawekaazo VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
aazhawa'amwaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
aazhawaandawaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
abwen:abwe VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
adaawaagen:adaawaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
adaawangen:adaawange VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
adaawen:adaawe VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
adisigaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
adoopon:adoopo VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
agoodwaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
agwaadaabiin:agwaadaabii VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
agwaawe VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
agwana'igaagen:agwana'igaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
agwaniin:agwanii VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
agwazhen VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
agwiin:agwii VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
agwin VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
akakanzhebwen:akakanzhebwe VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
andawadaawen:andawadaawe VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
andodamaagen:andodamaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
andodamaagen:nandodamaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
andoojii'igaagen:andoojii'igaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
anookiin VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
apaabowen:apaabowe VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
apakwaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
apakwen:apakwe VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
apanjigen VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
apenimon:apenimo VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
apibii'igaagen:apibii'igaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
apigaabawin:apigaabawi VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
apiitaagozin:apiitaagozi VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
apikweshimon:apikweshimo VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
apinikaazon:apinikaazo VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
apishimonikaagen:apishimonikaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
apisimoniken:apisimonike VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
apizhigaagen:apizhigaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
apizogaagen:apizogaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
asanjigon:asanjigo VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
ashkimaagen:ashkimaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
aspishimonikaagen:aspishimonikaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
ataason:ataaso VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
ataaswaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
awi'aazon:awi'aazo VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
awi'iwen VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
ayaawin:ayaawi VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
ayadaawangen:ayadaawange VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
babaamiwanen:babaamiwane VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
badagoshkoojigaagen:badagoshkoojigaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
badaka'igaagen:badaka'igaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
bagone'igaagen:bagone'igaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
bagwa'igaagen:bagwa'igaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
bakada'igaagen:bakada'igaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
bakite'igaagen:bakite'igaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
bakonamaagen:bakonamaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
bangisidaabiin VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
bapakite'igaagen:bapakite'igaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
bashanzhe'igaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
beshigwaajigaagen:beshigwaajigaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
bichi-minikwen VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
bigishkada'igaagen:bigishkada'igaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
biijimaanjigaagen:biijimaanjigaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
biindaaga'on:biindaaga'o VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
biindoomon:biindoomo VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
biinjiweba'igaagen:biinjiweba'igaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
biisiboojigaagen:biisiboojigaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
biitoogwaajigaagen:biitoogwaajigaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
biitoonigaagen:biitoonigaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
bimidaabiin VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
bimishkaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
bimiwanaagen:bimiwanaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
bimiwanen:bimiwane VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
bimoodaagen:bimoodaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
bimwaagone'igaagen:bimwaagone'igaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
binishkaagen:binishkaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
biniwanen:biniwane VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
boodaakwen:boodaakwe VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
boodawaagen:boodawaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
bookindibese VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
boozaabikinigaagen:boozaabikinigaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
booziiginigaagen:booziiginigaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
boozininjaagen:boozininjaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
bwaawanen:bwaawane VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
dabinoo'igaagen:dabinoo'igaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
dagonamaazon:dagonamaazo VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
dagwapikaazon:dagwapikaazo VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
dakigamishkoojigaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
dakobijigaagen:dakobijigaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
danadaawaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
danadaawe VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
debibidaabiin:debibidaabii VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
dibinawezi VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
dwaa'ibaagen:dwaa'ibaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
gaapizigaagen:gaapizigaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
gashkiigabin:gashkiigabi VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
giba'igaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
giba'ogaagen:giba'ogaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
gibishkwaande'igaagen:gibishkwaande'igaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
gigaakizo VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
gigine VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
gigizin:gigizi VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
giipon:giipo VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
giipon VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
giishkizhigaagen:giishkizhigaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
giizhishinin:giizhishin VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
ginwaapon VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
gitaakwa'igaagen:gitaakwa'igaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
giziibaagazheyaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
godikwa'igaagen:godikwa'igaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
gwaaba'iskomaagen:gwaaba'iskomaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
inadaawe VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
ishkwaandemikaagen:ishkwaandemikaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
izhiwanen:izhiwane VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
jaagisen:jaagise VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
maada'ookii VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
maawandoogwaasonikaagen:maawandoogwaasonikaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
madaakon:madaako VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
madoodiswaagen:madoodiswaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
magodaasikaagen:magodaasikaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
makandwen VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
makizinikaagen:makizinikaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
mashkikiikaagen:mashkikiikaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
mawinzon:mawinzo VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
miigiwen:miigiwe VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
minikwaajige VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
naaba'igaagen:naaba'igaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
naazibiiwanen:naazibiiwane VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
nandodamaagen VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
niimaako'abwen:niimaako'abwe VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
ningobii'igaagen:ningobii'igaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
ningwa'igaagen:ningwa'igaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
odaminon VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
odaminwaagen:odaminwaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
ogashkibidaaganin:ogashkibidaagani VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
okonaasin:okonaasi VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
omookomaanin:omookomaani VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
ondademon:ondademo VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
ondizin VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
owaagaakwadon:owaagaakwado VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
ozhi-ayaan:ozhi-ayaa VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
waaboozekonikaagen VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
waaswaagen:waaswaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
wanadaawen:wanadaawe VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
waniiken:waniike VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
wewebizonikaagen:wewebizonikaage VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
wiiwin:wiiwi VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
zhakamon VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
zhegwanzon:zhegwanzo VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
ziigiwanen:ziigiwane VAIO_Class=VAIO_Boundary ;
